Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1305
Commission merchant, defined.

Commission merchant shall mean any person engaged in the business of receiving any farm product for sale, on commission, or for or on behalf of another person.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 5.